Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0504.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 5. (1) The department shall promulgate and enforce rules
to carry out this act pursuant to in accordance with the
administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to
24.328. The rules, at a minimum, shall must include the following:
(a) Requirements for the submission of reports, plans, and
specifications for the design and construction of all or a part of
a waterworks system, or a part thereof, and a plan for operating
and maintaining all or a part of the a waterworks system, including
RMH S01148'25 (S-1) gc5wqi


the protection of water quality within the distribution system as
necessary to protect the public health.
(b) State drinking water standards and associated monitoring
requirements, the attainment and maintenance of which are necessary
to protect the public health.
(c) The classification of all or a part of a waterworks
systems or portions thereof, system, the examination for
certification of the operators of those waterworks systems
including shift operators of water treatment systems, and for the
issuance, suspension, and revocation of certificates.
(d) Criteria for capacity assessments performed by the
department at community supplies, nontransient noncommunity water
supplies, or a public water supply applying to the department for
assistance under part 54 of the natural resources and environmental
protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.5401 to 324.5418.
(e) Requirements for provision of facilities by public water
supplies that will assure ensure an adequate and reliable supply of
drinking water on a continuous basis.
(f) Requirements for the establishment and administration of
the microplastics program created in section 6a.
(2) Rules governing public water supplies promulgated under
former 1913 PA 98 , and which that were in effect on January 4,
1977 are continued in accordance with section 31 of the
administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.231, and
may be amended or rescinded by the director under this act.
(3) No rule promulgated may require the addition of any
substance for preventive health care purposes unrelated to
contamination of drinking water.
Sec. 6a. (1) Beginning July 1, 2027, and continuing until July
RMH S01148'25 (S-1) gc5wqi


1, 2030, the department shall establish and administer a
microplastics program to assess and characterize the presence of
microplastics in public water supplies. As part of the
microplastics program, the department shall monitor and test select
public water supplies and other water sources. The department shall
coordinate with universities, suppliers of water, nonprofit
organizations, professional societies, and governmental agencies to
develop accepted sampling strategies, testing schedules, analytical
methods, definitions, classifications, and laboratory capacity for
assessing microplastics in drinking water and other water sources.
The microplastics program is intended to be a sampling program that
provides an exploratory assessment of the prevalence,
characteristics, origins, and potential mitigation of microplastics
in drinking water and other water sources. The microplastics
program is not intended to be a universal monitoring and regulatory
program. Under the microplastics program, the department shall
consider all of the following:
(a) Shoreline surface water drinking water sources from the
Great Lakes.
(b) Major tributaries that support public water supplies.
(c) Inland surface water lakes that provide drinking water.
(d) Direct use of groundwater for drinking water within and
near agricultural operations.
(e) Use of groundwater or drinking water within 1 mile of a
landfill operation.
(f) The size of the public water supply.
(g) Impacts on environmental justice.
(h) Sample collection and analysis.
(2) The department shall coordinate with the department of
RMH S01148'25 (S-1) gc5wqi


health and human services to communicate with the public and to
provide guidance to suppliers of water to inform the public about
all of the following:
(a) Current scientific knowledge regarding microplastics and
the potential risks of microplastics.
(b) Uncertainties and gaps in scientific knowledge.
(c) Methods for reducing exposure to microplastics.
(d) Other information about the presence of microplastics in
specific public water supplies.
(3) Not later than July 1, 2031, the department shall prepare
and submit a report to the standing committees and the
appropriations subcommittees of the senate and house of
representatives with primary responsibility for issues under the
jurisdiction of the department and make the report available on the
department's website. The report must include the following:
(a) A summary of findings, including, but not limited to, all
of the following:
(i) Reports or technical memoranda that provide a summary of
any test completed under subsection (1), including, but not limited
to, the following information:
(A) Drinking water source, location, and description.
(B) Sampling date.
(C) Testing methodology.
(D) Microplastic shape, if available.
(E) Potential microplastic sources.
(F) Polymer type, if available.
(ii) The quantities of microplastics in public water supplies,
including the quantities in the water source that supplies the
public water supply.
RMH S01148'25 (S-1) gc5wqi


(b) Recommendations for next steps for addressing the effects
and presence of microplastics in public water supplies, including,
but not limited to, the following:
(i) The toxicity limit of microplastics based on best
available, peer-reviewed research or toxicity studies and findings
of the United States Environmental Protection Agency.
(ii) A preliminary risk assessment.
(iii) An overview of findings and critical issues.
(iv) Recommendations for continued and expanded monitoring and
analysis and public protection.
(4) Not later than July 1, 2031, the department shall provide
to suppliers, guidance on methods for communicating to the public
the results of the program and other relevant information regarding
microplastics.
(5) As used in this section, "microplastics" means solid
polymeric materials that may contain chemical additives or other
substances and that are particles less than 5,000 micrometers in
all 3 dimensions. Microplastics do not include polymers that are
derived in nature and that have not been chemically modified,
except by hydrolysis.
Final Page
RMH S01148'25 (S-1) gc5wqi